Washington statutes.
RCW 35.44.320

Reassessments—Credit for prior payments.

In case of reassessment, all sums paid on the former attempted assessments shall be credited to the property on account of which they were paid.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.44.320. Prior: 1911 c 98 s 43, part; 1909 c 71 s 1, part; 1893 c 95 s 2, part; RRS s 9396, part.]